Alabama, session 2026rs, HB240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Tuskegee University has a unique
relationship to the State of Alabama. Due to the unique nature
of the circumstances related to the establishment and
development of Tuskegee Institute which differs from that of
private schools and colleges receiving funds from the state
and from the state's public colleges and universities, the
institution should be afforded a unique treatment relative to
funding from the Education Trust Fund. Tuskegee Institute was
established by an act of the Legislature in 1881 and
separately incorporated by an act of the Legislature in 1892;
the Governor appoints five commissioners who serve as voting
members on the Tuskegee University Board; and the State
Superintendent of Education serves as an ex officio voting
commissioner on the Tuskegee University Board. Tuskegee has
received appropriations from the Legislature since 1881. Being
a private institution as well as a state related and supported
Page 1

a private institution as well as a state related and supported
HB240 Enrolled
institution, it is deemed that Tuskegee University should be
funded accordingly and not as the private schools and colleges
nor as the state public colleges and universities are funded.
Section 2. There is hereby appropriated the sum of
$16,300,159 from the Education Trust Fund to Tuskegee
University in Tuskegee, Alabama, for the support and
maintenance of the educational program of the institution, for
the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027. Of the above
appropriation, at least $2,000,000 shall be expended for the
agricultural research and extension service state match.
Section 3. The above appropriation is made for the
support of public education in Alabama and for the support and
maintenance of the above program. The appropriation shall be
subject to the provisions, terms, conditions, and limitations
of the Budget and Financial Control Act, Section 41-4-80 et
seq., Code of Alabama 1975, the provisions of the Budget
Management Act of 1976, Section 41-19-1 et seq., Code of
Alabama 1975, and any other provisions of this act.
Section 4. (a) Prior to the release of any funds
appropriated under this act the following reports shall be
submitted:
(1) An operations plan for the 2027 fiscal year,
including goals and measurable performance indicators, shall
be submitted to and approved by the Director of Finance, as
provided for state agencies in Section 41-19-10 of the Code of
Alabama 1975.
(2) An audited financial statement for all operations
during the 2025 fiscal year.
Page 2

during the 2025 fiscal year.
HB240 Enrolled
(b) It is the intent that funds appropriated for the
2027 fiscal year shall be released by the Director of Finance
following receipt of the above reports.
(c) In addition, quarterly reports shall be made to the
Director of Finance relating actual expenditures and
accomplishments to planned expenditures and accomplishments.
An end of year performance report for the 2027 fiscal year
shall be made to the Director of Finance stating the work
accomplished and the services provided and the costs of
accomplishing the work and providing the services, citing
meaningful measures of program effectiveness and costs, as is
required for state agencies in Section 41-19-11 of the Code of
Alabama 1975.
(d) The Director of Finance shall forward a copy of all
required reports to the Legislative Council in a timely
manner.
Section 5. This act shall become effective October 1, 2026.
Page 3

Section 5. This act shall become effective October 1, 2026.
HB240 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 12-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk

100
101
102
103
104 Senate 02-Apr-26 Passed
105
106
107
Page 4